Hawaii, session 2026, SB2490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part XLVII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§321    Surfboard wax; prohibited items; penalties.  (a)  Beginning January 1,     , it shall be unlawful to manufacture, sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in the State any surfboard wax to which PFAS chemicals have been intentionally introduced in any amount. (b)  Any manufacturer, distributor, or seller of surfboard wax that violates this part or any rule adopted pursuant to this part shall be subject to an administrative fine not to exceed: (1)  $ for the first violation; and (2)  $ for any subsequent violation." SECTION 2.  Section 321-601, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "intentionally introduced" to read as follows: ""Intentionally introduced" means deliberately utilized PFAS in the formulation of a package [or], packaging component, product, or product component where the continued presence of the PFAS is desired in the final package [or], packaging component, product, or product component to provide a specific characteristic, appearance, or quality." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________